District of Columbia statutes.
47-1379

Reopening judgments.

The Superior Court shall not open a judgment rendered in an action for foreclosure of the right of redemption, except on the grounds of lack of jurisdiction or fraud in the conduct of the action to foreclose; provided, that the reopening of a judgment on the ground of constructive fraud in the conduct of the action to foreclose shall not be entertained by the court unless an application to reopen a judgment rendered is filed within 90 days from the date of the judgment.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).